Hawaii, session 2025, SB56.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii has some of the nation's highest child care costs, and a lack of access to affordable child care is a burden to families and contributes substantially to the State's high cost of living.  According to a 2023 report by the national clearinghouse Child Care Aware, Hawaii is the least affordable state for center-based infant child care and center-based toddler care.  The average annual cost of center-based infant care in the State is $22,585, which is more than the cost of annual in-state tuition for an undergraduate student at the university of Hawaii at Manoa. The annual cost of center-based toddler care, at $17,925, is similarly high.  The coronavirus disease 2019 pandemic exacerbated this problem. According to a report by the Center for American Progress, more stringent safety guidelines resulting from the pandemic caused child care costs for infants to increase by nineteen per cent in the State, while child care costs for toddlers increased twenty-six per cent. The legislature further finds that there is a great unmet need for child care in the State. There are an estimated 66,262 children in Hawaii under the age of six who potentially need child care.  This stands in contrast to the 35,662 child care slots that are available in the State. Both the high cost and lack of access to high-quality child care make it difficult for families in Hawaii to work and thrive. The legislature also finds that providing child care to state employees and their families can help address the State's child care needs.  Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish a child care center pilot program for state employees and their families, with one child care center in or around the state capitol building and one in Kapolei. SECTION 2. The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by adding a new chapter to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Chapter STATE EMPLOYEE CHILD CARE CENTER PILOT PROGRAM §   -1  Definitions.  As used in this chapter: "Child care center" means a group child care center as defined in section 346-151. "Department" means the department of accounting and general services. "Eligible children" means children who have a parent, grandparent, aunt, uncle, or legal guardian who is an employee of the State. "Employee" means any full-time employee of the State, including any appointed or elected officer, legislator, justice, or judge. §   -2  Child care centers for eligible children of state employees; pilot program. (a)  The department, by contract, shall establish, equip, and operate a state employee child care center pilot program consisting of two child care centers on the island of Oahu for eligible children of state employees; provided that one child care center shall be located in or near the state capitol building and one child care center shall be located in Kapolei. (b) The child care centers may be located in state-owned office buildings, educational facilities and institutions, custodial facilities and institutions, or buildings or spaces used for legislative activities.  The child care centers may also be located in privately owned facilities located in convenient proximity to the place of employment of the employees to be served by the centers. (c) An operator of the child care centers under this section shall be selected in accordance with chapter 103D. (d) The child care centers established under this section shall provide full-time child care during weekdays on which a majority of state employees are on duty, beginning at least one-half hour before the regular work day begins and ending no earlier than one-half hour after that work day ends. (e) The department, by rule, may establish fees to be charged to employees to offset the cost of providing child care services; provided that the fees shall be as minimal as is practicable. (f) The department may accept money, equipment, or other property donated for use in connection with the provision of child care services. (g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the child care centers established under this section from accepting children of non-state employees if space is available; provided that fees charged for services shall be as minimal as practicable. (h) The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 as necessary to implement this chapter." SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $500,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purposes of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of accounting and general services for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025, and shall be repealed on June 30, 2030. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________